Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
BENEFITS IN THE LIFETIME BENEFIT COMPONENTS

31-31.5-401. Vesting and benefit eligibility.

A member with five years of service credit in one or a combination of more than one of the lifetime benefit components is considered vested for purposes of a pension payable from the lifetime benefit components of the statewide retirement plan.

A member is eligible for a normal retirement when:

The member has accumulated at least twenty-five years of service credit and has attained age fifty-five; or

The member has attained age fifty, the member's combined age and years of accrued service is equal to at least eighty, and the member is not receiving benefits pursuant to section 31-31-803.

A vested member who attains age fifty-five is eligible to terminate service and begin receiving an unreduced benefit. A member who terminates employment before attaining age fifty-five and who has at least five years of service credit may leave contributions in the plan and begin receiving an unreduced benefit upon attaining age fifty-five.

An active or inactive vested member who is not eligible for normal retirement, who has attained age fifty, who is not receiving or has terminated benefits pursuant to section 31-31-803, and who has terminated employment is eligible for an early retirement pension. The early retirement pension for a member is the benefit that the member would have received at age fifty-five reduced on an actuarial equivalent basis to reflect the early receipt of the benefit as determined by the board.

Subject to rules adopted by the board, years of service credit of a member who is employed by successive employers may be aggregated for determining eligibility and benefits provided by the lifetime benefit components of the statewide retirement plan if the service for each employer was rendered while the employer covered its members under the statewide retirement plan, the predecessor statewide defined benefit plan, or the defined benefit component of the predecessor statewide hybrid plan.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 288, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-402. Plan funding, actuarial valuation and adjustments to maintain the actuarial soundness of the plan.

The general assembly declares that the rates of member and employer contributions must be adequate to fund benefit liabilities accrued under the statewide retirement plan established by this article 31.5.

The board shall conduct an annual actuarial valuation of the statewide retirement plan and shall determine the cost of all benefits of the lifetime benefit components, which may include projected cost of living adjustments for each of the lifetime benefit components. The board shall submit an annual actuarial valuation report to the state auditor, the pension review committee, the legislative audit committee, and the joint budget committee of the general assembly, together with any recommendations concerning such liabilities as accrued. Amortization of liability over a forty-year period shall be deemed adequate to maintain actuarial stability.

The board shall periodically conduct a review and study of the actual experience of the assets and liabilities of the lifetime benefit components of the statewide retirement plan. The board shall adjust the assumptions made with regard to each component as a result of the review and study.

The board shall determine after each annual actuarial valuation if the cost of all benefits established by this part 4 and the cost of a normal retirement pension beginning at age fifty-five for members then eligible may be fully funded on an actuarially sound basis not including future projected cost of living adjustments without necessitating an increase in the employer and member contributions made pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

If in any year the board determines pursuant to subsection (2) of this section that the cost of the benefits described in part 5 may not be fully funded on an actuarially sound basis, the board, in its discretion, may take the following actions singularly or in any combination and in any order:

The board may terminate allocating surplus contributions to the money purchase component pursuant to section 31-31.5-301 (3);

The board may terminate making cost of living adjustments pursuant to section 31-31.5-410;

The board may order that the normal retirement pension commence such number of months as are actuarially supportable, from one to sixty, after age fifty-five for members who are otherwise eligible pursuant to section 31-31.5-401 (2)(a). If the board adjusts the age of eligibility pursuant to this subsection (4)(c)(I), it shall also adjust the age of eligibility for benefits under section 31-31.5-401 (2)(b), (3), and (4) in a like manner. The determination of the board is conclusive absent fraud.

A pension commenced before any adjustment in the age of eligibility pursuant to subsection (4)(c)(I) of this section is not subject to review. If a court determines that this subsection (4) is invalid, the age of retirement to be eligible for any normal retirement benefit shall be age sixty except for persons receiving a benefit at the time of the court's decision.

The board may prospectively order that the benefit multiplier used in section 31-31.5-403 (1)(b) be reduced from two and one-half percent to as low as two percent for any given year or years;

The board may suspend further implementation or participation in any plan amendment adopted pursuant to part 6 of this article 31.5 that contributes additional cost to the plan;

The board may suspend further participation in the deferred retirement option plan pursuant to section 31-31.5-409 if it determines that the option contributes additional cost to the statewide retirement plan; and

The board may reinstate any benefits terminated, adjusted, or suspended pursuant to this section if it determines that the action taken is no longer necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the lifetime benefit components. This may include, but is not limited to, retroactive reinstatement of the benefit multiplier reduced under subsection (4)(d) of this section.

If the actual financial experience of the lifetime benefits account is found to be more or less favorable than the assumed experience during the previous period, adjustments may be made by the board in the member and employer contributions as may be deemed feasible and advisable so long as the employer contribution rate adjustment is equal to the member contribution rate adjustment.

The board shall not increase employer or member contributions pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section unless it has taken the actions permitted under subsections (4)(a) to (4)(f) of this section and it finds that the increase is necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the plan.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the reduction of benefits below the level sustainable by the higher member or employer contribution rates established pursuant to section 31-31.5-601.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 289, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-403. Defined benefit component benefits.

In calculating the retirement pension for a member who has service credit in the defined benefit component, the benefit is the sum of the following:

Two percent multiplied by the service credit earned or purchased in the defined benefit component, not to exceed ten years of service credit, multiplied by the average of the member's highest three years' base salary in the defined benefit component; plus

Two and one-half percent multiplied by the service credit earned or purchased in the defined benefit component in excess of ten years multiplied by the average of the member's highest three years' base salary in the defined benefit component.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 291, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-404. Social security component benefits.

In calculating the retirement pension for a member who has service credit in the social security component, the benefit is the sum of the following:

One percent multiplied by the years of service credit in the social security component, not to exceed ten years of service credit, multiplied by the average of the member's highest three years' base salary in the social security component; plus

One and one-quarter percent multiplied by the years of service credit in the social security component in excess of ten years multiplied by the average of the member's highest three years' base salary in the social security component.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 291, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-405. Hybrid component benefits.

In calculating the normal retirement pension for a member who has years of service credit in the hybrid component, the benefit shall be:

A multiplier, which the board shall establish by adjusting the funding status of the predecessor statewide hybrid plan to equal the funding status of the predecessor statewide defined benefit plan using valuations as of December 31, 2021, and based on the recommendations made by the plan's actuary, multiplied by the years of service credit earned or purchased in the statewide hybrid plan prior to January 1, 2023, multiplied by the average of the member's highest three years' base salary; plus

One and one-half percent multiplied by the years of service credit earned or purchased in the hybrid component on or after January 1, 2023, multiplied by the average of the member's highest three years' base salary.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 291, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-406. Optional survivor benefits.

A member eligible for a normal, late, or early retirement pension may elect to receive a reduced pension payable to the member and, upon the member's death a reduced benefit to the member's designated beneficiary. The board shall establish such options by rule in a manner that provides for an actuarial equivalent benefit of the normal or early retirement pension otherwise payable.

If a member reaches age eligibility for a normal, vested, or early retirement pension, and dies before making an election allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or before the first pension payment has been deposited, and is survived by a spouse, dependent child, or designated beneficiary, the member shall be considered to have elected an actuarially reduced pension and retired on the day before the member's death. Payable to the members spouse, dependent child, or designated beneficiary, such reduced pension shall be payable to the member's designated beneficiary. A spouse, dependent child, or designated beneficiary of a member who has not yet reached age eligibility may elect to receive an actuarially reduced benefit beginning on the date that the member would have reached age eligibility in lieu of a death benefit under part 8 of article 31 and in lieu of a refund of member contributions pursuant to section 31-31.5-411.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 292, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-407. Minimum benefit.

If the total amount of pension benefits paid under the lifetime benefit component as provided in this article 31.5 at the time of death is less than the amount of the members' contributions to the lifetime benefit component, the difference shall be paid to:

The member's estate, if no pension payment was made pursuant to an option under section 31-31.5-406; or

The survivor's estate, if pension payments were made pursuant to an option under section 31-31.5-406.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 292, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-408. Late retirement.

Any member retiring and eligible for a normal or vested retirement benefit may elect to defer receipt of the pension until attaining age sixty-five years, but no later. In the case of such an election, the late retirement pension is the actuarial equivalent of the normal retirement pension as determined by the board.

The board may promulgate rules to allow members who are eligible to receive any type of retirement benefits to defer receipt of the benefits to the extent permitted under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" as amended, and the regulations promulgated pursuant to section 401(a)(9) of said code.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 292, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-409. Deferred retirement option plan (DROP).

The board may establish by rule a deferred retirement option plan for vested members who have attained age fifty. The purpose of the DROP is to allow an eligible member to elect, in lieu of immediate termination of employment and receipt of a lifetime retirement benefit, to continue employment for a specified period of time of up to five years and to have the member's otherwise deductible employee contribution and retirement benefits paid into the member's individual account created by section 31-31.5-503 until the end of the specified period of the member's participation, at which time employment ceases.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 293, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-410. Cost of living adjustments - definitions.

The benefits payable under the lifetime benefit components of the plan may be redetermined effective October 1 each year. To be eligible for redetermination, the benefits must have been paid for at least twelve calendar months prior to the effective date of redetermination.

Any redetermination of benefits made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be determined by the board in its discretion as a fiduciary of the statewide retirement plan after considering the funding level of the lifetime benefit components, the cost of the redetermination, the components' ability to fund future benefits, and any other factors that the board deems appropriate. The redetermined benefits shall not exceed the greater of:

One hundred three percent of the benefits paid for the prior twelve-month period; or

The benefits paid during the prior twelve-month period multiplied by a fraction using the consumer price index for the immediately preceding calendar year as the numerator and the consumer price index for the calendar year prior to the immediately preceding calendar year as the denominator.

As used in this section, "consumer price index" means the national consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers prepared by the United States department of labor.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 293, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-411. Refunds of member contributions.

Any member covered by the statewide retirement plan who terminates service may elect to have the member's accumulated contributions to one or more lifetime benefit components of the plan refunded together with five percent of the member's total accumulated contributions as interest in a lump sum and thereafter shall have no right to lifetime benefits provided by the plan.

If the member who terminates service and receives a refund of member contributions subsequently returns to service as an active member with an employer that covers its members under the statewide retirement plan, the member's prior service credit shall be restored when the member returns the member's refunded contributions to the lifetime benefit components, with interest accrued from the date of refund to the date of return, according to the terms and conditions established by the board. If the member fails to return the contributions and interest, the member shall be treated as a new member, and the member's prior service shall not be recognized in determining pension eligibility or pension benefits. The restoration of a member's service credit pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) shall not entitle the member to reinstatement of any previously forfeited balance in the member's money purchase component account or the separate retirement account.

If a member dies after termination of service, is not eligible for a vested, normal, or early retirement, and has not yet received a refund or began receiving benefit payments, the association shall refund the member's lifetime benefit component contributions to the member's designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, or dependent children. Where there is no designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, or dependent children, the refund shall be made to the deceased member's estate.

If a member who has not terminated service dies, and there is no spouse or dependents eligible for survivor benefits under part 8 of article 31 of this title 31, the deceased member's lifetime benefit component contributions may be refunded to:

The member's designated beneficiary if the member is not eligible for vested, early, or normal retirement. The designated beneficiary may in the alternative elect a lifetime benefit pursuant to section 31-31.5-406.

If there is no designated beneficiary, the member's estate.

The designated beneficiary of a member eligible for vested, early, or normal retirement shall receive the benefit described in section 31-31.5-406 (2) and no refund of contributions shall be made.

Upon payment of a refund of member contributions, no lifetime benefit components benefits shall be payable.

Refunds of contributions to the lifetime benefit components shall not be made to any members of employers who have failed to remit all contributions required under the provisions of the statewide retirement plan.

A member or the member's designated beneficiary, surviving spouse or partner in a civil union, or dependent children who is entitled to receive a refund of the member's defined benefit contributions may elect to have the refund credited to the member account in the money purchase component. Upon the refund being credited, the member or the member's designated beneficiary, surviving spouse or partner in a civil union, or dependent children are treated as having taken a refund from the defined benefit component for all purposes.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 293, § 1, effective August 10.